Georgia statutes. TITLE 38 Military, Emergency Management, and Veterans Affairs
Article 12 Emergency Communications Authority

Effective date. —

This article became effective January 1, 2019.
See the Editor’s notes.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 4-1/HB 751, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “(a) This Act shall become effective July 1, 2018, for the purposes of creating the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority and appointing the members thereof and the enactment of Section 2-11 and the provisions regarding billing practices contained in subsection (d) of Code Section 38-3-189.
For all other purposes, this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.

“(b) The provisions of this Act shall not in any manner diminish, extinguish, reduce, or affect any cause of action for audits, services, or the recovery of funds from service providers which may have existed prior to January 1, 2019. Any such cause of action is expressly preserved.”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency management disaster preparedness equipment grants-in-aid, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Defense Emergency Management Division, Chapter 155-2.

38-3-180.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Georgia Emergency Communications Authority Act.”

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-180

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751.

38-3-181.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Authority” means the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority established pursuant to Code Section 38-3-182.

“Board of directors” or “board” means the governing body of the authority.

(2.1)

“Emergency medical dispatch” means the management of requests for emergency medical assistance by utilizing a system of:

A tiered response or priority dispatching of emergency medical resources based on the level of medical assistance appropriate for the victim; and

Prearrival first aid or other medical instructions given by trained telecommunicators responsible for receiving 9-1-1 calls and dispatching public safety agencies.

“Emergency 9-1-1 system” or “9-1-1 system” has the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-5-122.

“Enhanced ZIP Code” has the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-5-122.

“Local government” means a county, municipality, regional authority, or consolidated government in this state that operates or contracts for the operation of a public safety answering point and has adopted a resolution or ordinance pursuant to Code Section 46-5-133 to impose 9-1-1 charges under Code Section 46-5-134.

“Next Generation 9-1-1” or “NG911” is a secure, nationwide, interoperable, standards-based, all Internet protocol emergency communications infrastructure enabling end-to-end transmission of all types of data, including, but not limited to, voice and multimedia communications from the public to a public safety answering point.

“9-1-1 charge” has the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-5-122.

“Public safety answering point” has the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-5-122.

“Service supplier” has the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-5-122.

“Telephone subscriber” has the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-5-122.

“Wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charge” has the same meaning as provided in Code Section 46-5-122.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-181

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751; Ga. L. 2022, p. 413, § 2/SB 505.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added paragraph (2.1).

38-3-182.
Establishment of Georgia Emergency Communications Authority; purpose; duties and responsibilities; board of directors; perpetual existence; power and authority; operation; regulation.

There is established the Georgia Emergency Communications Authority as a body corporate and politic, an instrumentality of the state, and a public corporation, and by that name the authority may contract and be contracted with and defend and bring actions, including, but not limited to, a private right of action to enforce this article. The authority shall be an entity within the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency and attached to said agency for all operational purposes.

All local governments as of July 1, 2018, shall be members of the authority. Additional local governments shall become members upon adoption of a resolution or ordinance to impose the monthly 9-1-1 charge as authorized by Code Section 46-5-133 and contingent upon approval by the authority which shall not be unreasonably withheld. Any local government member of the authority that ceases operating or contracting for the operation of a public safety answering point shall withdraw from the authority subject to the terms of any contract, obligation, or agreement with the authority.

The primary purpose of the authority shall be to administer, collect, audit, and remit 9-1-1 revenues for the benefit of local governments, as specified in this article, and on such terms and conditions as may be determined to be in the best interest of the operation of local governments in light of the following factors:

The public interest in providing cost-efficient collection of revenues;

Increasing compliance in collection of revenues;

Easing the administrative burden on vendors and service suppliers; and

Such other factors as are in the public interest and welfare of the citizens of Georgia.

In addition to the purposes specified in subsection (b) of this Code section, the authority shall have the duties and responsibilities to:

Apply for, receive, and use federal grants or state grants or both;

Study, evaluate, and recommend technology standards for the regional and state-wide provision of a public safety communications network and 9-1-1 system;

Identify any changes necessary to accomplish more effective and efficient 9-1-1 service across this state including consolidation and interoperability of 9-1-1 systems;

Identify any changes necessary in the assessment and collection of fees under Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46;

Develop, offer, or make recommendations to the Georgia Public Safety Training Center, Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council, and other state agencies as to training that should be provided to telecommunicators, trainers, supervisors, and directors of public safety answering points;

Recommend minimum standards for operation of public safety answering points;

Collect data and statistics regarding the performance of public safety answering points;

Identify any necessary changes or enhancements to develop and deploy NG911 statewide; and

Upon request by a public safety answering point, provide assistance to such public safety answering point with its locally managed processes to be regarded as Logan’s List: the collection, storage, retrieval, and dissemination of information voluntarily submitted to a public safety answering point which indicates an individual has a physical, mental, or neurological condition which impedes his or her ability to communicate with any law enforcement officer or emergency responder.

Control and management of the authority shall be vested in a board of directors which shall consist of the following:

The commissioner of public safety or his or her designee;

The commissioner of revenue or his or her designee;

The director of the Georgia Public Safety Training Center or his or her designee;

Three members appointed by the Governor who shall be 9-1-1 directors, each of whom shall be currently employed by a public safety answering point. The Georgia 9-1-1 Directors Association, the Georgia Chapter of the Association of Public Safety Communications Officials, and the Georgia Chapter of the National Emergency Number Association may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointments;

One member appointed by the Governor who shall be an elected member of a county governing authority that operates or contracts for the operation of a public safety answering point. The Association County Commissioners of Georgia may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;

One member appointed by the Governor who shall be a county manager, county administrator, or finance officer from a county that operates or contracts for the operation of a public safety answering point. The Association County Commissioners of Georgia may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;

One member appointed by the Governor who shall be an elected member of a city governing authority that operates or contracts for the operation of a public safety answering point. The Georgia Municipal Association may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;

One member appointed by the Governor who shall be a city manager, city administrator, or finance officer from a city that operates or contracts for the operation of a public safety answering point. The Georgia Municipal Association may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;

Two members from the telecommunications industry who shall be appointed by the Governor;

One member appointed by the Governor who is a sheriff responsible for managing a public safety answering point. The Georgia Sheriffs’ Association may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointment;

One police chief appointed by the Governor who is serving a local government. The Georgia Association of Chiefs of Police may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointment; and

One fire chief appointed by the Governor who is serving a local government. The Georgia Association of Fire Chiefs may provide recommendations to the Governor for such appointment.

The initial term for appointments made pursuant to subparagraphs (D), (E), (F), (G), and (H) of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be from July 1, 2018, until June 30, 2021. The initial term for appointments made pursuant to subparagraphs (I), (J), (K), and (L) of paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be from July 1, 2018, until June 30, 2020. All subsequent terms shall be for three years. Any vacancies that occur prior to the end of a term shall be filled by appointment in the same manner as the original appointment and shall be for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The board may appoint additional persons to serve in an advisory role to the board. Such advisers shall be nonvoting and shall not be counted in ascertaining if a quorum is present.

Members of the board of directors shall receive no compensation for their services but may be authorized by the authority to receive an expense allowance and reimbursement from funds of the authority in the same manner as provided for in Code Section 45-7-21, but only in connection with the member’s physical attendance at a meeting of the board.

Nine members of the board of directors shall constitute a quorum, and the affirmative votes of a majority of a quorum shall be required for any action to be taken by the board.

The executive director of the authority shall convene the initial meeting of the board of the authority no later than September 1, 2018, at which time the board shall elect one of its members as chairperson. In addition, the board shall elect from its membership a vice chairperson and a secretary/treasurer.

The board of directors shall promulgate bylaws and may adopt other procedures for governing its affairs and for discharging its duties as may be permitted or required by law or applicable rules and regulations.

The authority shall have perpetual existence.

The authority through its board of directors shall have the power and authority to:

Have a seal and alter the same at its pleasure;

Make and execute contracts, lease agreements, and all other instruments necessary or convenient to exercise the powers of the authority or to further the public purpose for which the authority is created;

Acquire by purchase, lease, or otherwise and to hold, lease, and dispose of real or personal property of every kind and character, or any interest therein, in furtherance of the purpose of the authority;

Apply for and to accept any gifts or grants, loan guarantees, loans of funds, property, or financial or other aid in any form from the federal government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, from the state government or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or from any other source for any or all purposes specified in this article and to comply, subject to the provisions of this article, with the terms and conditions thereof;

Deposit or otherwise invest funds held by it in any state depository or in any investment that is authorized for the investment of proceeds of state general obligation bonds and to use for its corporate purposes or redeposit or reinvest interest earned on such funds;

Exercise any powers granted by the laws of this state to public or private corporations that are not in conflict with the public purpose of the authority;

Do all things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers conferred by this article and to carry out such duties and activities as are specifically imposed upon the authority by law;

Bring and defend actions;

Provide for the collection of moneys;

Manage, control, and direct proceeds retained under subsection (a) of Code Section 38-3-188 and the expenditures made therefrom;

Distribute the proceeds identified under subsection (b) of Code Section 38-3-188 in such manner and subject to such terms and limitations as provided by such Code section; and

Exercise all other powers necessary for the development and implementation of the duties and responsibilities provided for in this article.

The creation of the authority and the carrying out of its purpose under this article are in all respects for the benefit of the people of this state. The authority shall be carrying out an essential governmental function on behalf of local governments in the exercise of the powers conferred upon it by this article and is, therefore, given the same immunity from liability for carrying out its intended functions as other state officials and employees.

The authority shall not be required to pay taxes or assessments upon any real or personal property acquired under its jurisdiction, control, possession, or supervision.

All moneys received by the authority pursuant to this article shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this article.

This article, being for the welfare of the state and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

Notwithstanding any provision of this Code section to the contrary, the authority shall have no jurisdiction concerning the setting of rates, terms, and conditions for the offering of telecommunications services, as defined in Code Section 46-5-162, or for the offering of broadband service, VoIP, or wireless service, as such terms are defined in Code Section 46-5-221.

The board shall be subject to and shall comply with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” in the same manner as an agency as such term is defined in Code Section 50-13-2. The board may promulgate and amend, from time to time, such rules or regulations, consistent with this article and Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” as it deems consistent with or required for the public welfare, for the administration of any provision of this article, or for the orderly conduct of the board’s affairs. Any claim by the authority that a service supplier has violated any provision of this article shall be adjudicated as a contested proceeding under Code Section 50-13-13 and be subject to judicial review under Code Section 50-13-19.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-182

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751; Ga. L. 2019, p. 1056, § 38/SB 52; Ga. L. 2021, p. 205, § 1/HB 631.

The 2019 amendment,

effective May 12, 2019, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “The commissioner of public safety” for “The commissioner of the Department of Public Safety” in subparagraph (d)(1)(A); substituted “The commissioner of revenue” for “The commissioner of the Department of Revenue” in subparagraph (d)(1)(B); and substituted “construed to effect” for “construed to affect” at the end of subsection (j).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in subsection (c), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (c)(7), substituted “; and” for a period at the end of paragraph (c)(8), and added paragraph (c)(9).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2018, “Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council” was substituted for “Georgia Peace Officers and Standards Training Council” in paragraph (c)(5).

38-3-183.
Appointment of executive director; role; additional staffing.

The director of the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency shall appoint an executive director, subject to approval by the board, who shall be the administrative head of the authority, and shall establish the salary of the executive director. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of such director. The executive director, with the concurrence and approval of such director, shall hire officers, agents, and employees; prescribe their duties, responsibilities, and qualifications; set their salaries; and perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the authority. Such officers, agents, and employees shall serve at the pleasure of the executive director.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-183

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751.

38-3-184.
Role of Attorney General.

The Attorney General shall provide legal services for the authority and, in connection therewith, Code Sections 45-15-13 through 45-15-16 shall be fully applicable.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-184

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751.

38-3-185.
Remission of 9-1-1 and enhanced 9-1-1 charges.

Beginning January 1, 2019, all 9-1-1 charges and all wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charges imposed by the governing authority of a local government pursuant to Code Section 46-5-133 and collected by a service supplier pursuant to Code Sections 46-5-134 and 46-5-134.1 shall be remitted monthly by each service supplier to the authority not later than the twentieth day of the month following the month in which they are collected. Any charges not remitted in a timely manner shall accrue interest at the rate specified in Code Section 48-2-40, until the date they are paid.

Each service supplier collecting and remitting 9-1-1 and wireless enhanced 9-1-1 charges to the authority pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall submit with the remitted charges a report identifying the amount of the charges being collected and remitted from telephone subscribers attributable to each county or municipality that operates a public safety answering point, including counties and municipalities that operate multijurisdictional or regional 9-1-1 systems or have created a joint authority pursuant to Code Section 46-5-138.

For purposes of the monthly report required in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the service supplier shall attempt to utilize enhanced ZIP Codes. If an enhanced ZIP Code designation is not available for an address or if the service supplier is unable to determine the applicable enhanced ZIP Code designation after exercising due diligence to determine the designation, the service supplier may apply the five-digit ZIP Code to that address. For purposes of this subsection, there is a rebuttable presumption that a service supplier has exercised due diligence if the service supplier has attempted to determine the enhanced ZIP Code designation by utilizing software used by the Streamlined Sales Tax Governing Board pursuant to Code Section 48-8-70.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-185

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751.

38-3-186.
Contracting with Department of Revenue for collection and disbursement of charges remitted and for collection and disbursement of prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges.

The authority shall contract with the Department of Revenue for the collection and disbursement of charges remitted to the authority under subsection (a) of Code Section 38-3-185, other than prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges under Code Section 46-5-134.2. Under such nonmonetary contract and to defray the cost of administering such collection and disbursement, the Department of Revenue shall receive payment equal to 0.25 percent of the total amount of the gross charges remitted to the authority under subsection (a) of Code Section 38-3-185, other than prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges under Code Section 46-5-134.2.

The authority shall also contract with the Department of Revenue for the collection and disbursement of prepaid wireless 9-1-1 charges remitted to counties and municipalities under Code Section 46-5-134.2. Under such nonmonetary contract and to defray the cost of administering such collection and disbursement, the Department of Revenue shall receive payment equal to 0.25 percent of the total amount of the gross charges remitted to the authority or Department of Revenue under Code Section 46-5-134.2.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-186

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751; Ga. L. 2022, p. 109, § 1/SB 84.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “0.25 percent” for “1 percent” in the second sentence of subsections (a) and (b).

38-3-187.
Planning and implementation of state-wide public safety communications network.

The authority and telecommunications service suppliers shall work in cooperation with the state to plan for and implement a state-wide public safety communications network.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-187

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751.

38-3-188.
Retention of funds by Department of Revenue; payments to local governments.

The Department of Revenue shall retain and remit from the total amount of funds collected by it from charges imposed pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 38-3-185 and pursuant to Code Section 46-5-134.2 an amount equal to 1 percent to the authority and an amount equal to 0.75 percent of the total amount to the Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund as further provided for in Code Section 47-17-63.

Except for the amounts retained by the authority, Department of Revenue, Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund, and service suppliers pursuant to Code Sections 38-3-186 and 46-5-134 and this Code section, the remainder of the charges remitted by service suppliers shall be paid by the Department of Revenue to each local government on a pro rata basis based on the remitted amounts attributable to each such local government reported by service suppliers in the reports required by subsection (b) of Code Section 38-3-185. Such payments shall be made by the Department of Revenue to such local governments not later than 30 days following the date charges must be remitted by service suppliers to the Department of Revenue pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 38-3-185. Under no circumstances shall such payments be, or be deemed to be, revenues of the state and such payments shall not be subject to or available for appropriation by the state for any purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-188

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751; Ga. L. 2022, p. 109, § 2/SB 84.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, rewrote subsection (a), which read: “The Department of Revenue shall retain from the charges remitted to it pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 38-3-185 and pursuant to Code Section 46-5-134.2 an amount equal to 1 percent of the total amount of such charges and remit such amount to the authority.”; and inserted “Peace Officers’ Annuity and Benefit Fund,” in the first sentence in subsection (b).

38-3-189.
Audit; penalties for noncompliance; approval of billing practices.

Beginning January 1, 2019, the authority is authorized to employ or contract with an independent auditor or the Department of Revenue to audit the financial and business records of any service supplier offering communication services capable of connecting 9-1-1 service to the extent necessary to ensure proper collection and remittance of charges in accordance with this article and with Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46. If the authority chooses to contract with the Department of Revenue to audit the financial and business records of any service supplier offering communication services capable of connecting 9-1-1 service, the contract shall be nonmonetary and any and all costs associated with the performance of such audits shall be considered paid for by the administrative fee retained by the Department of Revenue under Code Section 38-3-186. Under no circumstances shall the Department of Revenue retain any additional charges for the purpose of conducting such audits. Such audits shall apply only to charges required to be imposed and collected pursuant to Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46 on or after January 1, 2019. Any audits other than those conducted by the Department of Revenue shall be conducted at the authority’s sole expense. The Department of Revenue shall provide to the authority access to all of the department’s collection data and records of monthly returns of service suppliers under this Code section. Except as provided by Code Section 38-3-190, such data and records shall not be used by the authority for any purpose other than audits under this Code section and shall otherwise retain any confidential status while in the possession of or use by the authority or others retained by the authority.

The board shall develop a schedule for auditing service suppliers according to criteria adopted by the board. Such schedule shall provide for an audit of a service supplier not more than once every three years. Any such audit shall cover a representative sample of the service supplier’s customer base in the state.

Any claim by the authority seeking to adjust the amount of any billing, remittance, or charge reported by the service supplier as required under Code Section 38-3-185 or imposing any penalty shall be limited to a period of three years prior to the date of the initial notice to the service supplier of the audit.

Failure of a service supplier to comply with any audit required under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, when notice of such audit has been duly served upon a service supplier’s registered agent, shall result in a civil penalty of not more than $1,000.00 per day for each day the service supplier refuses to comply, commencing on a date certain as stated in such notice, which in no case shall be less than 45 days, unless otherwise agreed in writing by the parties. A good faith attempt by a service supplier to comply with any such audit shall serve as a defense to a claim of failure to comply in any contested proceeding under Code Section 50-13-13 or judicial review under Code Section 50-13-19, and if upheld, there shall be no civil penalty.

Willful failure of any service supplier to have billed the monthly charges under Code Section 38-3-185 or 46-5-134.2 or to have remitted such collected charges as required shall be subject to a civil penalty of not more than $25,000.00 in the aggregate or 3 percent of the amount that should have been remitted, whichever is less. The civil penalty shall be in addition to the amount that should have been remitted and shall accrue interest at the rate specified in Code Section 48-2-40. The remedy set forth in this Code section shall be enforced solely by the authority and shall be the only remedy for any claim against a service supplier for failure to bill or remit the monthly charges under Code Section 38-3-185 or 46-5-134.2.

A service supplier shall not incur any liability, including, but not limited to, liability for the payment of unbilled or unremitted charges, for any billing practice previously or subsequently approved in writing by the authority or otherwise approved pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. A service supplier may request that the authority approve a billing practice by a written request sent to the executive director of the authority by certified mail. The authority may request additional information from the service supplier regarding the billing practice.

The authority shall issue a written decision within 90 days of the executive director’s receipt of the service supplier’s written request for approval of the billing practice; provided, however, that the authority may, in its discretion, either request additional information or determine that it needs more time, in which case the authority shall provide notice of same to the service supplier and a single additional 90 day period shall commence.

In the event the authority does not issue a written decision within the time period specified under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the billing practice shall be deemed approved pursuant to this subsection.

The written approval of a billing practice under this subsection or the approval of a billing practice under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of this subsection shall not impair or prohibit the board from adopting and implementing subsequently new requirements by rule or regulation that the board deems appropriate which supersede any such prior approved billing practices; provided, however, that in no case shall any approval of a billing practice by the authority be superseded for a period of at least three years following the date of approval.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-189

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751.

38-3-190.
Confidential nature of information; aggregate complying of data and release; compliance with judicial orders.

Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, all information submitted by a service supplier to the authority or Department of Revenue pursuant to this article shall be presumed to be confidential, proprietary, a trade secret, or subject to exemption from disclosure under state or federal law and shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50. Except as provided in this Code section, such information shall not be released to any person other than to the submitting service supplier, the authority, or auditors or attorneys employed by or under contract with the authority or the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency without the express permission of the submitting service supplier. Members of the authority shall also have access to information for the purpose of determining the accuracy of collections and remittances of individual service suppliers related to the member’s jurisdiction. Such information shall be used solely for the purposes stated under this article.

Information collected by the authority and Department of Revenue related to this article and Part 4 of Article 2 of Chapter 5 of Title 46 may be publicly released or published but only in aggregate amounts that do not identify or allow identification of numbers of subscribers or revenues attributable to an individual service supplier. All requests for information shall be submitted to the authority and not directly to the Department of Revenue.

Nothing in this Code section shall prohibit the authority or Department of Revenue from complying with a court order or request of a state or federal grand jury, taxing or regulatory authority, law enforcement agency, or prosecuting attorney in conjunction with an ongoing administrative, criminal, or tax investigation.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-190

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751.

38-3-191.
Limitation on use of funds, rights, and privileges.

All funds, distributions, revenues, grants, appropriations, and rights and privileges of value of every nature accruing to the authority shall be used only for the purpose of developing, maintaining, administering, managing, and promoting the authority, state-wide 9-1-1 advancements, and state-wide public safety communications interoperability and may never be appropriated for any other purpose.

History.

Code 1981, §

38-3-191

, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 689, § 1-1/HB 751.